Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-558
Republican River Compact Litigation Contingency Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Republican River Compact Litigation Contingency Cash Fund is created. The Director of Administrative Services shall use the fund to make payments in an amount up to $5,500,000 in accordance with any court order pursuant to Kansas v. Nebraska, No. 126 Original. Such payment or payments shall only be made by the Department of Administrative Services upon written certification by the Attorney General of the amount necessary to satisfy the court-ordered amount. The fund shall receive revenue from fund transfers as authorized by the Legislature and from fees, charges, and any other revenue source specifically designated by the Legislature for deposit in the fund. Further, upon the written certification of the Attorney General to the Director of Administrative Services that the State of Nebraska has satisfied in full its payment requirements ordered by the court pursuant to Kansas v. Nebraska, No. 126 Original, the fund shall be terminated and any remaining balance shall be transferred to the Cash Reserve Fund. Any money in the Republican River Compact Litigation Contingency Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2015, LB661, § 17.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.